Washington statutes.
RCW 35.82.090

Rentals and tenant selection.

In the operation and management of rental units which are rented to persons of low income in any housing project an authority shall at all times observe the following duties with respect to rentals and tenant selection: (1) It may rent or lease the dwelling accommodations therein to persons of low income and at rentals within the financial reach of such persons of low income; (2) it may rent or lease to a low-income tenant dwelling accommodations consisting of the number of rooms (but no greater number) which it deems necessary to provide safe and sanitary accommodations to the proposed occupants thereof, without overcrowding; and (3) it shall not accept any person as a low income tenant in any housing project designated for persons of low income if the person or persons who would occupy the dwelling accommodations have an annual net income in excess of five times the annual rental of the quarters to be furnished such person or persons, except that in the case of families with three or more minor dependents, such ratio shall not exceed six to one; in computing the rental for this purpose of selecting tenants, there shall be included in the rental the average annual cost (as determined by the authority) to occupants of heat, water, electricity, gas, cooking range and other necessary services or facilities, whether or not the charge for such services and facilities is in fact included in the rental. This income limitation does not apply to housing projects designated for senior citizens.

Nothing contained in this section or RCW 35.82.080 shall be construed as limiting the power of an authority to vest in an obligee the right, in the event of a default by the authority, to take possession of a housing project or cause the appointment of a receiver thereof, free from all the restrictions imposed by this section or RCW 35.82.080.

[ 1989 c 363 s 4; 1979 ex.s. c 187 s 3; 1977 ex.s. c 274 s 4; 1965 c 7 s 35.82.090. Prior: 1939 c 23 s 10; RRS s 6889-10. Formerly RCW 74.24.090.]

NOTES:

Severability—1979 ex.s. c 187: See note following RCW 35.82.020.